Washington statutes.
RCW 39.04.110

Penalty for false entries.

Any director, supervisor, officer or employee of the state and any commissioner, trustee, supervisor, officer or employee of any municipality who shall knowingly make any false entry in any account or record required by this chapter or who shall knowingly certify to any false statement in any certificate required by this chapter, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 1923 c 183 s 10; RRS s 10322-10.]

NOTES:

Falsifying accounts: RCW 42.20.070.

Misconduct of public officers: Chapter 42.20 RCW.